Louisiana, session 2026, HB592.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:299.3(B) through (E) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§299.3. Off-road vehicles; utility terrain vehicles
* * *
B. Notwithstanding the provisions in R.S. 32:299, the operation of a utility
terrain vehicle upon the public roads or streets of this state is prohibited, except as
follows:
(1) A utility terrain vehicle may be operated only upon a parish road that has
been designated by a parish or a municipal street that has been designated by a
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-192 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 592
municipality for use by a utility terrain vehicle. Upon a designation that a utility
terrain vehicle may be operated on a designated road or street, the responsible
governmental entity shall post appropriate signage indicating that the operation is
authorized.
(1) A registered utility terrain vehicle may be operated upon any parish or
state road or municipal street provided such activity is in compliance with the
requirements contained in this Section.
(2) To protect public safety, a local governmental subdivision may regulate
or restrict the operation of registered utility terrain vehicles on public roadways or
municipal streets and may, at its discretion, post signage providing notice of such
regulation or restriction.
(2) A utility terrain vehicle may cross any divided highway, highway,
roadway, or street with a posted speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per hour
at an intersection.
C. A utility terrain vehicle operated on any roadway or street shall be
equipped with the minimum motor vehicle equipment appropriate for motor vehicle
safety consistent with the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards within 49 CFR
Part 571, headlamps, front and rear turn signal lamps, tail lamps, stop lamps, reflex
reflectors, including one on each side as far to the rear as practicable and one red
reflector on the rear of the vehicle, an exterior mirror mounted on the driver's side
of the vehicle and either an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger's side of the
vehicle or an interior mirror, a parking brake, an adequate windshield, a windshield
wiper, speedometer, odometer, braking for each wheel, a seat belt assembly installed
at each designated seating position, and a vehicle identification or serial number.
D.(1) Any utility terrain vehicle operated upon a parish road or municipal
street shall be registered with the state of Louisiana through the Department of
Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles, as an off-road vehicle and
shall display proper registration a decal issued by the office of motor vehicles.
(2) Registration of utility terrain vehicles may include a quick response (QR)
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-192 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 592
code containing encrypted vehicle and registration information accessible to
authorized law enforcement personnel. This provision shall take effect when the
department's electronic vehicle and title registration system is updated to
accommodate the registration of these vehicles and the issuance of QR codes.
E. A person operating a utility terrain vehicle shall be at least twenty-one
years of age and possess a valid driver’s license.
* * *